test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-ae_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:
  Noun - hellá:
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom:  hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen:  heˊḷá
    hellá+N+Sg+Acc:  heˊḷá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill:  heeḷán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc:  helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com:  helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe:  heˊḷáttáá
    hellá+N+Ess:  hellán
    hellá+N+Par:  hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom:  heˊḷáh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen:  heˊḷái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill:  helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc:  heˊḷáin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com:  heˊḷáiguin
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe:  heˊḷáittáá

  Noun - hellá: # á-stems
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom: hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen: heḷá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill: heeḷán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc: helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com: helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe: heḷáttáá
    hellá+N+Ess: hellán
    hellá+N+Par: hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom: heḷáh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen: heḷái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc: helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill: helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc: heḷáin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com: heḷáiguin
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe: heḷáittáá


  Noun - pyerá:
    pyerá+N+Sg+Nom:  pyerá # lovnâsääni, ij oro nuávditmin uánánemnjuolgâdusâid
    pyerá+N+Sg+Gen:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Acc:  pyerá
    pyerá+N+Sg+Ill:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Sg+Loc: [pyerást, pyeráást]
    pyerá+N+Sg+Com:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Sg+Abe:  pyeráttáá
    pyerá+N+Ess:  pyerán
    pyerá+N+Par:  pyerád
    pyerá+N+Pl+Nom:  pyeráh
    pyerá+N+Pl+Gen:  pyerái
    pyerá+N+Pl+Acc:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Ill:  pyeráid
    pyerá+N+Pl+Loc:  pyeráin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Com:  pyeráiguin
    pyerá+N+Pl+Abe:  pyeráittáá

  Noun - pijgá:
    pijgá+N+Sg+Nom:  pijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Gen:  piijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Acc:  piijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Ill:  piijgán
    pijgá+N+Sg+Loc:  [piijgást, pijgáást]
    pijgá+N+Sg+Com:  pijgáin
    pijgá+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊjgáttáá
    pijgá+N+Ess:  pijgán
    pijgá+N+Par:  pijgád
    pijgá+N+Pl+Nom:  piijgáh
    pijgá+N+Pl+Gen: [piijgái, piˊjgái]
    pijgá+N+Pl+Acc:  piijgáid
    pijgá+N+Pl+Ill:  pijgáid
    pijgá+N+Pl+Loc:  piijgáin
    pijgá+N+Pl+Com:  piˊjgáiguin
    pijgá+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊjgáittáá

  Noun - stiváh:
    stiváh+N+Pl+Nom:  stiˊváh
    stiváh+N+Pl+Gen:  stiˊvái
    stiváh+N+Pl+Acc:  stiˊváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Ill:  stiˊváid
    stiváh+N+Pl+Loc:  stiˊváin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Com:  stiˊváiguin
    stiváh+N+Pl+Abe:  stiˊváittáá

  Noun - liljá:
    liljá+N+Sg+Nom:  liljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊljá
    liljá+N+Sg+Ill:  liilján
    liljá+N+Sg+Loc:  liljáást
    liljá+N+Sg+Com:  liljáin
    liljá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊljáttáá
    liljá+N+Ess:  lilján
    liljá+N+Par: liljád
    liljá+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊljáh
    liljá+N+Pl+Gen:  [liiljái, liˊljái]
    liljá+N+Pl+Acc: liiljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Ill:  liljáid
    liljá+N+Pl+Loc: [liiljáin, liˊljáin]
    liljá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊljáiguin
    liljá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊljáittáá

  Noun - tiljá:
    tiljá+N+Sg+Nom:  tiljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊljá
    tiljá+N+Sg+Ill:  tiilján
    tiljá+N+Sg+Loc:  tiljáást
    tiljá+N+Sg+Com:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊljáttáá
    tiljá+N+Ess:  tilján
    tiljá+N+Par:  tiljád
    tiljá+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊljáh
    tiljá+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊljái
    tiljá+N+Pl+Acc:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Ill:  tiljáid
    tiljá+N+Pl+Loc:  tiljáin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊljáiguin
    tiljá+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊljáittáá

  Noun - linjá:
    linjá+N+Sg+Nom:  linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊnjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊnjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Ill:  liinján
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc:  linjáást
    linjá+N+Sg+Com:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊnjáttáá
    linjá+N+Ess:  linján
    linjá+N+Par:  linjád
    linjá+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊnjáh
    linjá+N+Pl+Gen:  [linjái, liˊnjái]
    linjá+N+Pl+Acc:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Ill:  linjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Loc:  linjáin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊnjáiguin
    linjá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊnjáittáá

  Noun - tikká:
    tikká+N+Sg+Nom:  tikká
    tikká+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊká
    tikká+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊká
    tikká+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikká+N+Sg+Loc:  tikkáást
    tikká+N+Sg+Com:  tikkáin
    tikká+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊkáttáá
    tikká+N+Ess:  tikkán
    tikká+N+Par:  tikkád
    tikká+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊkáh
    tikká+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊkái
    tikká+N+Pl+Acc:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Ill:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Loc:  tiˊkáin
    tikká+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊkáiguin
    tikká+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊkáittáá

  Noun - sivlá:
    sivlá+N+Sg+Nom:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Gen:  siˊvlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Acc:  siˊvlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Ill:  siivlán
    sivlá+N+Sg+Loc:  sivláást
    sivlá+N+Sg+Com:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊvláttáá
    sivlá+N+Ess:  sivlán
    sivlá+N+Par:  sivlád
    sivlá+N+Pl+Nom:  siˊvláh
    sivlá+N+Pl+Gen: [siivlái, siˊvlái]
    sivlá+N+Pl+Acc:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Ill:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Loc:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Com:  siˊvláiguin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊvláittáá

  Noun - lijmá:
    lijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  lijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  liijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  liijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  liijmán
    lijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  lijmáást
    lijmá+N+Sg+Com:  lijmáin
    lijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊjmáttáá
    lijmá+N+Ess:  lijmán
    lijmá+N+Par:  lijmád
    lijmá+N+Pl+Nom:  liijmáh
    lijmá+N+Pl+Gen: [liijmái, liˊjmái]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  liijmáid
    lijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  [lijmáid, liijmáid]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  liijmáin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊjmáiguin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊjmáittáá

  Noun - sijmá:
    sijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  sijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  siijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  siijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  siijmán
    sijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  sijmáást
    sijmá+N+Sg+Com:  sijmáin
    sijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊjmáttáá
    sijmá+N+Ess:  sijmán
    sijmá+N+Par:  sijmád
    sijmá+N+Pl+Nom: siijmáh
    sijmá+N+Pl+Gen: [siijmái, siˊjmái]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  siijmáid
    sijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  siijmáid, sijmáid]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  siijmáin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Com:  siˊjmáiguin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊjmáittáá

  Noun - ripá:
    ripá+N+Sg+Nom:  riˊpá
    ripá+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊvá
    ripá+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊvá
    ripá+N+Sg+Ill:  riˊpán
    ripá+N+Sg+Loc:  riiváást
    ripá+N+Sg+Com:  riˊváin
    ripá+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊváttáá
    ripá+N+Ess:  rippáán
    ripá+N+Par:  rippáád
    ripá+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊváh
    ripá+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊvái
    ripá+N+Pl+Acc:  riˊváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Ill:  riváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊváin
    ripá+N+Pl+Com:  riˊváiguin
    ripá+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊváittáá

  Noun - cirrá:
    cirrá+N+Sg+Nom:  cirrá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Gen:  ciˊṛá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Acc:  ciˊṛá
    cirrá+N+Sg+Ill:  ciiṛán
    cirrá+N+Sg+Loc:  cirráást
    cirrá+N+Sg+Com:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Sg+Abe:  ciˊṛáttáá
    cirrá+N+Ess:  cirrán
    cirrá+N+Par:  cirrád
    cirrá+N+Pl+Nom:  ciˊṛáh
    cirrá+N+Pl+Gen:  ciˊṛái
    cirrá+N+Pl+Acc:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Ill:  cirráid
    cirrá+N+Pl+Loc:  cirráin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Com:  ciˊṛáiguin
    cirrá+N+Pl+Abe:  ciˊṛáittáás

  Noun - kissá:
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom:  kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiṣán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc:  kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com:  kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊṣáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess:  kissán
    kissá+N+Par:  kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊṣáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊṣái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc:  [kissáid, kiˊṣáid]
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill:  kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊṣáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊṣáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊṣáittáá

  Noun - kissá: # á-stems
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom: kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen: kiṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc: kiṣá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill: kiiṣán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc: kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com: kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe: kiṣáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess: kissán
    kissá+N+Par: kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom: kiṣáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen: kiṣái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc: kissáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com: kiṣáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe: kiṣáittáá


  Noun - pittá:
    pittá+N+Sg+Nom:  pittá
    pittá+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊtá
    pittá+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊtá
    pittá+N+Sg+Ill:  piitán
    pittá+N+Sg+Loc:  pittáást
    pittá+N+Sg+Com:  pittáin
    pittá+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊtáttáá
    pittá+N+Ess:  pittán
    pittá+N+Par: pittád
    pittá+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊtáh
    pittá+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊtái
    pittá+N+Pl+Acc:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Ill:  pittáid
    pittá+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊtáin
    pittá+N+Pl+Com:  piˊtáiguin
    pittá+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊtáittáá

  Noun - hijvá:
    hijvá+N+Sg+Nom:  hijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Gen:  hiijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Acc:  hiijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Ill:  hiijván
    hijvá+N+Sg+Loc:  hijváást
    hijvá+N+Sg+Com:  hijˊváin
    hijvá+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊjváttáá
    hijvá+N+Ess:  hijván
    hijvá+N+Par:  hijvád
    hijvá+N+Pl+Nom:  hiijváh
    hijvá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiijvái, hiˊjvái]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Acc:  hiijváid
    hijvá+N+Pl+Ill:  [hiijváid, hijváid]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Loc:  hijváin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊjváiguin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊjváittáá

  Noun - liššá:
    liššá+N+Sg+Nom:  liššá
    liššá+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊṣ̌á
    liššá+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊṣ̌á
    liššá+N+Sg+Ill:  liiṣ̌án
    liššá+N+Sg+Loc:  liššáást
    liššá+N+Sg+Com:  liššáin
    liššá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊṣ̌áttáá
    liššá+N+Ess:  liššán
    liššá+N+Par: liššád
    liššá+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊṣ̌áh
    liššá+N+Pl+Gen:  liṣ̌ái
    liššá+N+Pl+Acc:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Ill:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊṣ̌áin
    liššá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊṣ̌áiguin
    liššá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊṣ̌áittáá

  Noun - káigá:
    káigá+N+Sg+Nom:  káigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Gen: kááigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Acc: kááigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Ill:  kááigán
    káigá+N+Sg+Loc:  káigáást
    káigá+N+Sg+Com:  káigáin
    káigá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊigáttáá
    káigá+N+Ess:  káigán
    káigá+N+Par: káigád
    káigá+N+Pl+Nom:  kááigáh
    káigá+N+Pl+Gen:  [kááigái, káigái]
    káigá+N+Pl+Acc:  kááigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Ill:  káigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Loc:  kááigáin
    káigá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊigáiguin
    káigá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊigáittáá

  Noun - vuáisá:
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáiˊsá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáisást
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Com:  vuáiˊsáin
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊisáttáá
    vuáisá+N+Ess:  vuáiˊsán
    vuáisá+N+Par:  vuáiˊsád
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáisáh
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuáisái, vuáˊisái]
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáiˊsáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊisáiguin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊisáittáá

  Noun - nollá:
    nollá+N+Sg+Nom:  nollá
    nollá+N+Sg+Gen:  noḷá
    nollá+N+Sg+Acc:  noḷá
    nollá+N+Sg+Ill:  nooḷán
    nollá+N+Sg+Loc:  nolláást
    nollá+N+Sg+Com:  nolláin
    nollá+N+Sg+Abe:  noˊḷáttáá
    nollá+N+Ess:  nollán
    nollá+N+Par:  nollád
    nollá+N+Pl+Nom:  noˊḷáh
    nollá+N+Pl+Gen:  noˊḷái
    nollá+N+Pl+Acc:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Ill:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Loc:  [nolláin, noˊḷáin]
    nollá+N+Pl+Com:  noˊḷáiguin
    nollá+N+Pl+Abe:  noˊḷáittáá

  Noun - hommá:
    hommá+N+Sg+Nom:  hommá
    hommá+N+Sg+Gen:  hoṃá
    hommá+N+Sg+Acc:  hoṃá
    hommá+N+Sg+Ill:  hooṃán
    hommá+N+Sg+Loc:  hommáást
    hommá+N+Sg+Com:  hommáin
    hommá+N+Sg+Abe:  hoˊṃáttáá
    hommá+N+Ess:  hommán
    hommá+N+Par: hommád
    hommá+N+Pl+Nom:  hoˊṃáh
    hommá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hommái, hoˊṃái]
    hommá+N+Pl+Acc:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Ill:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Loc:  hoˊṃáin
    hommá+N+Pl+Com:  hoˊṃáiguin
    hommá+N+Pl+Abe:  hoˊṃáittáá

  Noun - torppá:
    torppá+N+Sg+Nom:  torppá
    torppá+N+Sg+Gen:  toˊrpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Acc:  toˊrpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Ill:  toorpán
    torppá+N+Sg+Loc:  torppáást
    torppá+N+Sg+Com:  torppáin
    torppá+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊrpáttáá
    torppá+N+Ess:  torppán
    torppá+N+Par: torppád
    torppá+N+Pl+Nom:  toˊrpáh
    torppá+N+Pl+Gen:  toˊrpái
    torppá+N+Pl+Acc:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Ill:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Loc:  toˊrpáin
    torppá+N+Pl+Com:  toˊrpáiguin
    torppá+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊrpáittáá
